Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Chapter 10 Crimes, Offenses and Penalties

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks and Financial Institutions §§ 431 to 476.

Bank officer's or employee's misapplication of funds as state criminal offense, 34 ALR4th 547.

Who is “officer, director, agent, or employee” of bank, or is “connected in any capacity” with bank and therefore subject to prosecution and punishment for misapplication of bank funds under 18 USC § 656, 57 ALR Fed 537.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 732 to 783.